csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cnj_s.yaml
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimagiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwadiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimadiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasigwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaawaapan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaapan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwindiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimindiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigosiigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawagen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaawagen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadisaawegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawaden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaawaden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigosiigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisaawangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisaawangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwaawinden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: mawadisaawinden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigosig
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigod
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwag
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisag
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadiseg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigosig
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigod
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwind
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: mawadisind
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigosigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigopan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwagiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisagiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadisegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwadiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisadiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigosigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigopan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwindiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: mawadisindiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigosiiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigowaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: mawadishisiiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: mawadishiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: mawadishisiiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: mawadishiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishisiiwangidwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishiwangidwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishisiiwangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishiwangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: mawadisigoosiiwaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: mawadisigoowaangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigosiwaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigoyaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: mawadishisiwaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: mawadishiyaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: mawadishisiwaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: mawadishiyaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishisiwangidwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishiyangidwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishisiwangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishiyangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: mawadisigoosiwaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: mawadisigooyaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigosiwaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigoyaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: mawadishisiwaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: mawadishiyaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: mawadishisiwaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: mawadishiyaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishisiwangidwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishiyangidwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishisiwangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishiyangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: mawadisigoosiwaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: mawadisigooyaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigosiiwangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigowangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisisiinowangwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisinowangwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisisiinowangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisinowangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: mawadisigoosiiwangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: mawadisigoowangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigosiwang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigoyang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisisinowangwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisinangwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisisinowang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisinang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: mawadisigoosiwang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: mawadisigooyang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigosiwangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigoyangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisisinowangwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisinangwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisisinowangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisinangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: mawadisigoosiwangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: mawadisigooyangiban
